Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 3. Provisions Common to Swamp Land Districts.

§ 51-33-201.
Appointment of commissioners; bond.

Swampland districts heretofore organized under the provisions of Sections 371 through 391, inclusive, of the Code of 1906 and amendments thereto shall continue to operate under the provisions of said laws, and the adoption of this Code of 1972 shall not be held to repeal such laws insofar as any of such districts are concerned. However, no districts shall hereafter be organized under said laws.

In all cases where there are no commissioners of such a swampland district now in office, the board of supervisors of the county in which a swampland district is located shall have the power and authority to appoint three (3) commissioners for such swampland district, whose term of office shall be for a period of four (4) years from the date of such appointment. In the event a vacancy in the office of any such commissioner shall result from death, resignation or any other cause, such vacancy shall be filled by the board of supervisors by appointment for the unexpired term; and upon the expiration of the term of office of any commissioner appointed hereunder, the board of supervisors shall appoint his successor for a like term of four (4) years. All commissioners appointed under the provisions of this article shall give bond, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4528; 1942, § 4757; Laws, 1950, ch. 469, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 41; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 51-33-203.
Duties and powers of commissioners.

The commissioners provided for herein shall have control and management of all of the affairs of such swamp land district, shall have the power and authority to make improvements to and to maintain the existing drainage channel or channels of such district, and shall have the power to contract and cooperate with any appropriate agency of the United States government in so improving or maintaining any such channel or channels.

The commissioner shall have the further power and authority to expend the funds of such district for such purposes and all other proper and necessary purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4757-01; Laws, 1950, ch. 469, § 2.

§ 51-33-205.
Tax levy.

When so recommended by such commissioners, the board of supervisors of the county wherein such swamp land district is located shall have the power and authority to levy an annual tax upon all the lands included in such district, which said tax shall not exceed twenty cents (20¢) per acre in any one year. All of the provisions of said Sections 371 to 391, inclusive, Mississippi Code of 1906, as amended, shall control the manner and method of the levying, collection, and distribution of such tax; and the proceeds thereof may be expended for the purposes herein authorized.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4757-02; Laws, 1950, ch. 469, § 3.

§ 51-33-207.
General authority of commissioners.

The said commissioners shall have full power and authority to do and perform all acts and things necessary and desirable in carrying out the purposes of this article and shall have all powers set forth in said Sections 371 to 391, Code of 1906.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4757-03; Laws, 1950, ch. 469, § 4.